Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.170.010

Menstrual hygiene products.

(1) By the beginning of the 2022-23 academic year, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 must make menstrual hygiene products available at no cost in all gender-neutral bathrooms and bathrooms designated for female students.

(2) Menstrual hygiene products must include sanitary napkins, tampons, or similar items.

(3) Institutions of higher education must bear the cost of supplying menstrual hygiene products. Institutions of higher education may seek grants or partner with nonprofit or community-based organizations to fulfill this obligation.

[ 2021 c 163 s 2.]